Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB984.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1327.2 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1327.2. Attendance Policy at Charter, Regional Charter and Cyber Charter Schools.--(a) Each charter, regional charter and cyber charter school shall establish an attendance policy designed to accurately determine when a child who is enrolled in a charter, regional charter or cyber charter school 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 has an unexcused or excused absence, or is present for instruction, which may differ from the policy of the school district in which the child resides. The policy must conform to the provisions of this act relating to compulsory attendance.(a.1) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a cyber charter school shall include in its attendance policy the following:(1) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or excused absence or is present for synchronous instruction. To be present for synchronous instruction, a child must be present and visible to the teacher on camera during each synchronous instructional period for each course.(2) A prohibition specifying that a cyber charter school administrator or chief administrator may not alter an attendance record taken by a teacher, unless the alteration corrects an error made in good faith.(3) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or excused absence or is present for asynchronous instruction. To be present for asynchronous instruction, a child must satisfactorily complete the coursework and achieve weekly educational coursework benchmarks. The following requirements shall apply to the weekly educational coursework benchmarks:(i) A cyber charter school shall establish weekly educational coursework benchmarks for students participating in asynchronous instruction and shall submit the benchmarks to the department for approval by June 30 of each year for the following school year. If the department has not approved, denied or returned the benchmarks for revision within 45 days, the benchmarks shall be deemed approved for the following school year.20250SB0984PN1126 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Each student shall satisfactorily complete the coursework and achieve the benchmarks established by the cyber charter school. If a student does not achieve the weekly benchmark, the student shall receive an unexcused absence for the incomplete coursework.(b) Notwithstanding section 1333.2(a), in the case of a child enrolled in a cyber charter school the venue for the filing of a citation under section 1333.1 shall be based upon the residence of the child. A cyber charter school may participate in a proceeding under sections 1333.1, 1333.2 and 1333.3 in person, by telephone conferencing, by video conferencing or by any other electronic means.(c) [Charter, regional charter and cyber] (1) Cyber charter schools shall report all unexcused absences directly to the department annually through the Pennsylvania Information Management System (PIMS).(2) Cyber charter schools shall submit information related to the completion of the benchmarks established under subsection (a.1)(3) annually through PIMS.(3) For students who have been found to be truant or habitually truant, cyber charter schools shall report the information required under paragraphs (1) and (2) directly to the department monthly through PIMS.Section 2. Section 1333(a) of the act is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1333. Procedure When Child is Truant.--(a) When a child is truant, the school shall notify in writing the person in parental relation with the child who resides in the same household as the child of the child's violation of compulsory 20250SB0984PN1126 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school attendance within ten (10) school days of the child's third unexcused absence. The notice:* * *(2.1) shall include notice to the person in parental relation that a child who is habitually truant may not transfer, during the school year, to virtual instruction offered by the educational entity in which the child is enrolled or to a cyber charter school unless a judge determines that t he child is unable to comply with compulsory school attendance requirements and t he transfer is in the best interest of the child; (2.2) shall include State and local resources to assist the child and the person in parental relation with returning the child to compliant compulsory school attendance and opportunities for further academic recovery in response to the truant behavior;* * *(c.1) A child who is habitually truant may not transfer, during the school year, to virtual instruction offered by the educational entity in which the child is enrolled or to a cyber charter school unless a judge determines that the child is unable to comply with compulsory school attendance requirements and the transfer is in the best interest of the child.* * *Section 3. Sections 1333.1, 1333.2 and 1333.3 of the act are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1333.1. Procedure by School When Child Habitually Truant.--* * *(d.1) An educational entity in which the child is enrolled shall provide the child with a school attendance improvement plan and shall continue to pursue remedies to the child's 20250SB0984PN1126 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 habitual truancy until the child is no longer truant or is no longer of compulsory school age, regardless of whether the child was enrolled at the current educational entity or another educational entity at the time of truancy.* * *Section 1333.2. Procedure Upon Filing of Citation.--* * *(a.1) The president judge of a judicial district may adopt a local policy to identify a judge to handle all truancy matters for a single school district.* * *(c.1) A school employe or a county children and youth agency may attend the hearing with respect to the citation in person, by telephone conferencing, by video conferencing or by any other electronic means.* * *(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of the judge to enter a sentence after the completion of the school year in which the child was habitually truant.Section 1333.3. Penalties for Violating Compulsory School Attendance Requirements.--* * *(i) At the time of conviction of a child for a violation of the requirements of compulsory school attendance under this article, the court shall make a determination on the ability of the child to transfer or continue virtual instruction in accordance with section 1333(c.1).Section 4. Section 1333.4 of the act is repealed:[Section 1333.4. Study of Truancy Procedure.--(a) Five (5) years after commencement of the first school year to which section 1333 applies, the Joint State Government Commission shall undertake a study of the procedures for how a school 20250SB0984PN1126 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 handles children who are truant and habitually truant and evaluate the effectiveness of the procedures in improving school attendance and whether the procedures should be revised, including to require court involvement sooner in certain truancy cases.(b) The Joint State Government Commission shall establish an advisory committee that may include representatives of the Department of Education, educational entities and organizations, the judiciary, district attorneys, law enforcement, public organizations involved in truancy issues, representatives of county children and youth agencies and juvenile justice agencies and other organizations selected by the Joint State Government Commission to consult with the Joint State Government Commission in conducting the study.(c) The Joint State Government Commission shall hold informational meetings to receive testimony from professionals or organizations with expertise in truancy and truancy prevention.(d) The Joint State Government Commission shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the Education Committee of the Senate and the Education Committee of the House of Representatives not later than twelve (12) months after undertaking the study.]Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1333.5. Department Supports to Prevent Truancy.--The department, in coordination with the Department of Human Services, shall develop programs and best practices for student supports to prevent truancy and habitual truancy.Section 6. Section 1339 of the act is amended to read:Section 1339. Reports to [Superintendent of Public 20250SB0984PN1126 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Instruction.--Every school district] Secretary of Education.--(a) Every educational entity shall report to the [Superintendent of Public Instruction upon the] Secretary of Education information related to student attendance and enforcement of the provisions for compulsory attendance and the cost thereof, in such detail as [said Superintendent of Public Instruction shall request.] requested by the department. The department shall post quarterly reports related to the enforcement of compulsory attendance, which shall contain all the information required to be provided to the department under this article. Information shall be reported and posted in a manner consistent with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 90-247, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g).(b) A school administrator, employe or representative of an educational entity who knowingly falsifies a report or data submitted to the department under subsection (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0984PN1126 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718